Washington statutes.
RCW 38.42.120

Federal servicemembers civil relief act—Applicability.

(1) The federal servicemembers civil relief act of 2003, P.L. 108-189, as amended, is specifically declared to apply in proper cases in all the courts of this state.

(2) A violation of the federal servicemembers civil relief act of 2003 is a violation of this chapter.

[ 2014 c 65 s 3.]